Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-202.01
Watercourses; obstructions; power of county board.

In all counties the county board shall have the power to cause all natural watercourses to be kept clean and free of obstructions.

Laws 1951, c. 95, § 1, p. 263;

Laws 1969, c. 246, § 1, p. 904.